Louisiana, session 2026, HB232.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 23:181, 184(introductory paragraph) and (2)(a), 187, and 191 are
hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§181. Secretary to prescribe and furnish forms employment certificate form; form
requirements; collection of forms
A. The secretary shall prescribe and furnish all forms to be used in
connection with the issuance of employment certificates by each issuing authority
the employment certificate form on the department's website or at its local field
offices.
B. The employment certificate form shall, at a minimum, include the
following:
(1) A signature line for the minor seeking employment.
(2) A line on which the minor can indicate the date he signs the certificate.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 232 ENROLLED
(3) A statement attesting that the minor's parent or legal guardian consents
to and authorizes the minor to be employed and a signature line for the parent or
legal guardian affirming such consent and authorization.
(4) A line on which the parent or legal guardian can indicate the date he
signs the certificate.
(5) A statement explaining the submission of proofs of age as required by
R.S. 23:184 followed by boxes to select what proofs of age the minor intends to
submit to the employer.
(6) A line for the minor to provide the name of the prospective employer.
C. The department shall develop a policy and implement a procedure to
collect all employment certificate forms from any employer who employs a minor
within this state. The department shall promulgate any rules and regulations
necessary for the enforcement of this Section.
* * *
§184. Requirements for issuance Employment certificate requirements for validity;
proofs of age criteria
Employment certificates shall be issued valid and binding only upon the
personal application by the minor desiring employment, accompanied by the written
permission of the minor's parent or legal guardian and upon submission to and
approval by the issuing authority employer of the following papers:
(2) One of the following proofs of age:
(a) A birth certificate, a short-form birth certification card, or a signed
statement thereof issued by the recorder of births.
* * *
§187. Signing of certificate by minor; return by employer after Validity of
employment certificates for employers; maintenance of employment
certificates after termination of employment
The employment certificate shall be signed by the minor in the presence of
the issuing authority and then it shall be returned to the minor for delivery to the
employer. An employment certificate shall be valid only for the employer for whom
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 232 ENROLLED
issued listed on the employment certificate form, and the employer shall be required
to maintain it on file for a period of fourteen days after the termination of the minor's
employment.
§191. Revocation
The secretary may revoke any employment or other certificate if in his
judgment it was improperly issued or if the minor is illegally employed. If the
certificate is revoked, the issuing authority, the employer, and the minor, shall be
notified and the minor shall not thereafter be employed or permitted to work until a
new certificate has been legally obtained.
Section 2. R.S. 23:183, 184(1), and 188 are hereby repealed in their entirety.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.